California statutes. Insurance Code
(1) Encourage or direct small employers to refrain from filing an application for coverage with a carrier because of the health status, claims experience, industry, occupation, or geographic location within the carrier’s approved service area of the small employer or the small employer’s employees.

(2) Encourage or direct small employers to seek coverage from another carrier or the California Health Benefit Exchange because of the health status, claims experience, industry, occupation, or geographic location within the carrier’s approved service area of the small employer or the small employer’s employees.

(f) No carrier shall, directly or indirectly, enter into any contract, agreement, or arrangement with an agent or broker
 that provides for or results in the compensation paid to an agent or broker for a health benefit plan to be varied because of the health status, claims experience, industry, occupation, or geographic location of the small employer or the small employer’s employees. This subdivision shall not apply with respect to a compensation arrangement that provides compensation to an agent or broker on the basis of percentage of premium, provided that the percentage shall not vary because of the health status, claims experience, industry, occupation, or geographic area of the small employer.

(g) A policy or contract that covers a small employer, as defined in Section 1304(b) of PPACA and in subdivision (q) of Section 10755 shall not establish rules for eligibility, including continued eligibility, of an individual, or dependent of an individual, to
 enroll under the terms of the plan based on any of the following health status-related factors:

(1) Health status.

(2) Medical condition, including physical and mental illnesses.

(3) Claims experience.

(4) Receipt of health care.

(5) Medical history.

(6) Genetic information.

(7) Evidence of insurability, including conditions arising out of acts of domestic violence.

(8) Disability.

(9) Any other health status-related factor as determined by any federal regulations, rules, or guidance issued pursuant to Section 2705 of the federal Public Health Service Act.

(h) If a carrier enters into a contract, agreement, or other arrangement with a third-party administrator or other entity to provide administrative, marketing, or other services related to the offering of health benefit plans to small employers in this state, the third-party administrator shall be subject to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 195, Sec. 15.   (SB 1034)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10755.05.1.

(a) For contracts expiring after July 1, 1994, 60 days prior to July 1, 1994, an association that meets the definition of guaranteed association, as set forth in Section 10755, except for the requirement that 1,000 persons be covered, shall be entitled to purchase small employer health coverage as if the association were a guaranteed association, except that the coverage shall be guaranteed only for those members of an association, as defined in Section 10755, (1) who were receiving coverage or had successfully applied for coverage through the association as of June 30, 1993, (2) who were receiving coverage through the association as of December 31, 1992, and whose coverage lapsed at any time thereafter because the employment through which coverage was received ended or an employer’s contribution to
 health coverage ended, or (3) who were covered at any time between June 30, 1993, and July 1, 1994, under a contract that was in force on June 30, 1993.

(b) An association obtaining health coverage for its members pursuant to this section shall otherwise be afforded all the rights of a guaranteed association under this chapter including, but not limited to, guaranteed renewability of coverage.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 15.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10755.06.

Every carrier shall file with the commissioner the reasonable participation requirements that will be required in renewing its health benefit plans. Participation requirements of a health benefit plan shall be applied uniformly among all small employer groups, except that a carrier may vary application of minimum employer participation requirements by the size of the small employer group and whether the employer contributes 100 percent of the eligible employee’s premium. Employer contribution requirements of a health benefit plan shall not vary by employer size. A carrier shall not establish a participation requirement that (1) requires a person who meets the definition of a dependent in subdivision (d) of Section 10755 to enroll as a dependent if he or she is otherwise eligible for coverage and wishes to enroll as an
 eligible employee and (2) allows a carrier to reject an otherwise eligible small employer because of the number of persons that waive coverage due to coverage through another employer. Members of an association eligible for health coverage eligible under subdivision (t) of Section 10755 but not electing any health coverage through the association shall not be counted as eligible employees for purposes of determining whether the guaranteed association meets a carrier’s reasonable participation standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 15.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10755.08.

A health benefit plan shall not impose a preexisting condition provision or a waiting or affiliation period upon any individual.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 195, Sec. 17.   (SB 1034)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10755.09.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as prohibiting a carrier from restricting enrollment of late enrollees to open enrollment periods consistent with federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 15.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10755.11.

No carrier shall be required by the provisions of this chapter:

(a) To include in a health benefit plan an otherwise eligible employee or dependent, when the eligible employee or dependent does not work or reside within a carrier’s approved service area, except as provided in Section 10755.02.1.

(b) To offer coverage to an eligible employee, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 10755, who within 12 months of application for coverage terminated from a health benefit plan offered by the carrier.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 15.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10755.13.

All grandfathered health benefit plans shall be renewable with respect to all eligible employees or dependents at the option of the policyholder, contractholder, or small employer except as follows:

(a) (1) For nonpayment of the required premiums by the policyholder, contractholder, or small employer, if the policyholder, contractholder, or small employer has been duly notified and billed for the charge and at least a 30-day grace period has elapsed since the date of notification or, if longer, the period of time required for notice and any other requirements pursuant to Section 2703, 2712, or 2742 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Secs. 300gg-2, 300gg-12, and 300gg-42) and any subsequent rules or regulations has
 elapsed.

(2) An insurer shall continue to provide coverage as required by the policyholder’s, contractholder’s, or small employer’s policy during the period described in paragraph (1). Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect or impair the policyholder’s, contractholder’s, small employer’s, or insurer’s other rights and responsibilities pursuant to the subscriber contract.

(b) If the insurer demonstrates fraud or an intentional misrepresentation of material fact under the terms of the policy by the policyholder, contractholder, or small employer or, with respect to coverage of individual enrollees, the enrollees or their representative.

(c) Violation of a material contract provision relating to employer contribution or group participation rates by the policyholder, contractholder, or small employer.

(d) When the carrier ceases to write, issue, or administer new or existing grandfathered or nongrandfathered small employer health benefit plans in this state, provided, however, that the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) Notice of the decision to cease writing, issuing, or administering new or existing small employer health benefits plans in this state is provided to the commissioner, and to either the policyholder, contractholder, or small employer at least 180 days prior to the discontinuation of the coverage.

(2) Small employer health benefit plans subject to this chapter shall not be canceled for 180 days after the date of the notice required under paragraph (1). For that business of a carrier that remains in force, any carrier that ceases to write, issue, or administer new or existing health benefit plans
 shall continue to be governed by this chapter.

(3) A carrier that ceases to write, issue, or administer new health benefit plans to small employers in this state after the passage of this chapter shall be prohibited from writing, issuing, or administering new health benefit plans to small employers in this state for a period of five years from the date of notice to the commissioner.

(e) When a carrier withdraws a health benefit plan from the small employer market, provided that the carrier notifies all affected policyholders, contractholders, or small employers and the commissioner at least 90 days prior to the discontinuation of those contracts, and that the carrier makes available to the small employer all nongrandfathered small employer health benefit plans which it markets and satisfies the requirements of Section 10714.

(f) If coverage is made available through a bona fide association pursuant to subdivision (q) of Section 10755 or a guaranteed association pursuant to subdivision (s) of Section 10755, the membership of the employer or the individual, respectively, ceases, but only if that coverage is terminated under this subdivision uniformly without regard to any health status-related factor of covered individuals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 15.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10755.14.

Premiums for grandfathered health benefit plans written or administered by carriers on or after the January 1, 2014, shall be subject to the following requirements:

(a) (1) The premium for new business shall be determined for an eligible employee in a particular risk category after applying a risk adjustment factor to the carrier’s standard employee risk rates. The risk adjusted employee risk rate may not be more than 110 percent or less than 90 percent.

(2) The premium charged a small employer for new business shall be equal to the sum of the risk adjusted employee risk rates.

(3) The standard employee risk
 rates applied to a small employer for new business shall be in effect for no less than 12 months.

(b) (1) The premium for in force business shall be determined for an eligible employee in a particular risk category after applying a risk adjustment factor to the carrier’s standard employee risk rates. The risk adjusted employee risk rate may not be more than 110 percent or less than 90 percent. The risk adjustment factor applied to a small employer may not increase by more than 10 percentage points from the risk adjustment factor applied in the prior rating period. The risk adjustment factor for a small employer may not be modified more frequently than every 12 months.

(2) The premium charged a small employer for in force business shall be equal to the sum of the risk adjusted employee risk rates. The standard employee risk rates shall be in effect for 12
 months.

(c) (1) For any small employer, a carrier may, with the consent of the small employer, establish composite employee and dependent rates for renewal of in force business. The composite rates shall be determined as the average of the risk adjusted employee risk rates for the small employer, as determined in accordance with the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b). The sum of the composite rates so determined shall be equal to the sum of the risk adjusted employee risk rates for the small employer.

(2) The composite rates shall be used for all employees and dependents covered throughout a rating period of 12 months, except that a carrier may reserve the right to redetermine the composite rates if the enrollment under the health benefit plan changes by more than a specified percentage during the rating period. Any redetermination of the composite
 rates shall be based on the same risk adjusted employee risk rates used to determine the initial composite rates for the rating period. If a carrier reserves the right to redetermine the rates and the enrollment changes more than the specified percentage, the carrier shall redetermine the composite rates if the redetermined rates would result in a lower premium for the small employer. A carrier reserving the right to redetermine the composite rates based upon a change in enrollment shall use the same specified percentage to measure that change with respect to all small employers electing composite rates.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 15.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10755.15.

Carriers shall apply standard employee risk rates consistently with respect to all small employers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 15.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10755.16.

In connection with the renewal of any grandfathered health benefit plan to small employers:

Each carrier shall make a reasonable disclosure, as part of its solicitation and sales materials, of the following:

(a) The extent to which the premium rates for a specified small employer are established or adjusted in part based upon the actual or expected variation in claims costs of the employees and dependents of the small employer.

(b) The provisions concerning the carrier’s ability to change premium rates and the factors
 other than claim experience which affect changes in premium rates.

(c) Provisions relating to the guaranteed issue of policies and contracts.

(d) Provisions relating to the prohibition of any preexisting condition provision.

(e) Provisions relating to the small employer’s right to apply for any nongrandfathered health benefit plan written, issued, or administered by the carrier, at the time of application for a new health benefit plan, or at the time of renewal of a health benefit plan, consistent with the requirements of PPACA.

(f) The availability, upon
 request, of a listing of all the carrier’s nongrandfathered health benefit plans, offered inside or outside the California Health Benefit Exchange, including the rates for each benefit plan design.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 15.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10755.17.

(a) No carrier shall renew coverage subject to this chapter until it has done all of the following:

(1) A statement has been filed with the commissioner listing all of the carrier’s grandfathered health benefit plans currently in force in this state, identified by form number, and, if previously approved by the commissioner, the date approved by the commissioner as well as the standard employee risk rate for each risk category for each benefit plan design and the highest and lowest risk adjustment factors that the carrier intends to use in determining rates for each benefit plan design. When filing a new benefit plan design pursuant to Section 10755.05, carriers may submit both the policy form and the standard employee risk rates for each
 risk category at the same time.

(2) Either:

(A) Thirty days expires after that statement is filed without written notice from the commissioner specifying the reasons for his or her opinion that the carrier’s risk categories or risk adjustment factors do not comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(B) Prior to that time the commissioner gives the carrier written notice that the carrier’s risk categories and risk adjustment factors as filed comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(b) No carrier shall renew or revise a grandfathered health benefit plan lawfully provided pursuant to subdivision (a), and no carrier shall change the risk categories, risk adjustment factors, or standard employee risk rates for a grandfathered health benefit plan
 until all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The carrier files with the commissioner a statement of the specific changes which the carrier proposes in the risk categories, risk adjustment factors, or standard employee risk rates.

(2) Either:

(A) Thirty days expires after such statement is filed without written notice from the commissioner specifying the reasons for his or her opinion that the carrier’s risk categories or risk adjustment factors do not comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(B) Prior to that time the commissioner gives the carrier written notice that the carrier’s risk categories and risk adjustment factors as filed comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(c) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, when a carrier is changing the standard employee risk rates of a health benefit plan lawfully provided under subdivision (a) or (b) but is not changing the risk categories or risk adjustment factors which have been previously authorized, the carrier need not comply with the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), but instead shall submit the revised standard employee risk rates for the health benefit plan prior to renewing the health benefit plan.

(d) When submitting filings under subdivision (a), (b), or (c), a carrier may also file with the commissioner at the time of the filings a statement of the standard employee risk rate for each risk category the carrier intends to use for each month in the 12 months subsequent to the date of the filing. Once the requirements of the applicable subdivision (a), (b), or (c), have been met, these rates shall be used by the carrier
 for the 12-month period unless the carrier is otherwise informed by the commissioner in his or her response to the filings submitted under subdivision (a), (b), or (c), provided that any subsequent change in the standard employee risk rates charged by the carrier which differ from those previously filed with the commissioner must be newly filed in accordance with this subdivision and provided that the carrier does not change the risk categories or risk adjustment factors for the health benefit plan.

(e) If the commissioner notifies the carrier, in writing, that the carrier’s risk categories or risk adjustment factors do not comply with the requirements of this chapter, specifying the reasons for his or her opinion, it is unlawful for the carrier, at any time after the receipt of such notice, to utilize the noncomplying health benefit plan, benefit plan design, risk categories, or risk adjustment factors in conjunction with the health benefit
 plans or benefit plan designs for which the filing was made.

(f) Each carrier shall maintain at its principal place of business copies of all information required to be filed with the commissioner pursuant to this section.

(g) Each carrier shall make the information and documentation described in this section available to the commissioner upon request.

(h) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit the commissioner to establish or approve the rates charged to policyholders for health benefit plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 15.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10755.18.

(a) In addition to any other remedy permitted by law, the commissioner shall have the administrative authority to assess penalties against carriers, insurance producers, and other entities engaged in the business of insurance or other persons or entities for violations of this chapter.

(b) Upon a showing of a violation of this chapter in any civil action, a court may also assess the penalties described in this chapter, in addition to any other remedies provided by law.

(c) Any production agent or other person or entity engaged in the business of insurance, other than a carrier, that violates this chapter is liable for administrative penalties of not more than two hundred
 fifty dollars ($250) for the first violation.

(d) Any production agent or other person or entity engaged in the business of insurance, other than a carrier, that engages in practices prohibited by this chapter a second or subsequent time, or who commits a knowing violation of this chapter, is liable for administrative penalties of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation.

(e) Any carrier that violates this chapter is liable for administrative penalties of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the first violation and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each subsequent violation.

(f) Any carrier that violates this chapter with a frequency that indicates a general business practice or commits a knowing
 violation of this chapter, is liable for administrative penalties of not less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) and not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for each violation.

(g) An act or omission that is inadvertent and that results in incorrect premium rates being charged to more than one policyholder shall be a single violation for the purpose of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 15.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10755.18.5.

(a) (1) In addition to any other remedy permitted by law, whenever the commissioner shall have reason to believe that any carrier, production agent, or other person or entity engaged in the business of insurance has violated this chapter, and that a proceeding by the commissioner in respect thereto would be in the interest of the public, the commissioner may issue and serve upon that entity an order to show cause containing a statement of the charges, a statement of the entity’s potential liability under this chapter, and a notice of a public hearing thereon before the Administrative Law Bureau of the department to be held at a time and place fixed therein, which shall not be less than 30 days after the service thereof, for the purpose of determining whether the commissioner
 should issue an order to that entity to pay the penalty imposed by this chapter and such order or orders as shall be reasonably necessary to correct, eliminate, or remedy the alleged violations of this chapter, including, but not limited to, an order to cease and desist from the specified violations of this chapter.

(2) The hearings provided by this subdivision shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted therein.

(b) (1) Whenever it appears to the commissioner that irreparable loss and injury has occurred or may occur to an insured, employer, employee, or other member of the public because a carrier, production agent, or other person or entity engaged in the business of
 insurance has violated this chapter, the commissioner may, before hearing, but after notice and opportunity to submit relevant information, issue and cause to be served upon the entity such order or orders as shall be reasonably necessary to correct, eliminate, or remedy the alleged violations of this chapter, including, but not limited to, an order requiring the entity to forthwith cease and desist from engaging further in the violations which are causing or may cause such irreparable injury.

(2) At the same time an order is served pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subdivision, the commissioner shall issue and also serve upon the person a notice of public hearing before the Administrative Law Bureau of the department to be held at a time and place fixed therein, which shall not be less than 30 days after the service thereof.

(3) The hearings provided by this subdivision shall be
 conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted therein.

(4) At any time prior to the commencement of a hearing as provided in this subdivision, the entity against which the commissioner has served an order may waive the hearing and have judicial review of the order by means of any remedy afforded by law without first exhausting administrative remedies or procedures.

(c) If, after hearing as provided by subdivision (a) or (b), the charges, or any of them, that an entity has violated this chapter are found to be justified, the commissioner shall issue and cause to be served upon that entity an order requiring that entity to pay the penalty imposed by this chapter and such order or orders as shall be reasonably
 necessary to correct, eliminate, or remedy the alleged violations of this chapter, including, but not limited to, an order to cease and desist from the specified violations of this chapter.

(d) In addition to any other penalty provided by law or the availability of any administrative procedure, if a carrier, after notice and hearing, is found to have violated this chapter knowingly or as a general business practice the commissioner may suspend the carrier’s certificate of authority to transact disability insurance. The order of suspension shall prescribe the period of such suspension. The proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 15.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10755.18.6.

(a) Carriers may enter into contractual agreements with qualified associations, as defined in subdivision (b), under which these qualified associations may assume responsibility for performing specific administrative services, as defined in this section, for qualified association members. Carriers that enter into agreements with qualified associations for assumption of administrative services shall establish uniform definitions for the administrative services that may be provided by a qualified association or its third-party administrator. The carrier shall permit all qualified associations to assume one or more of these functions when the carrier determines the qualified association demonstrates that it has the administrative capacity to assume these functions.

For the purposes of this section, administrative services provided by qualified associations or their third-party administrators shall be services pertaining to eligibility determination, enrollment, premium collection, sales, or claims administration on a per-claim basis that would otherwise be provided directly by the carrier or through a third-party administrator on a commission basis or an agent or solicitor workforce on a commission basis.

Each carrier that enters into an agreement with any qualified association for the provision of administrative services shall offer all qualified associations with which it contracts the same premium discounts for performing those services the carrier has permitted the qualified association or its third-party administrator to assume. The carrier shall apply these uniform discounts to the carrier’s risk adjusted employee risk rates after the carrier has determined the qualified
 association’s risk adjusted employee risk rates pursuant to Section 10755.14. The carrier shall report to the department its schedule of discounts for each administrative service.

In no instance may a carrier provide discounts to qualified associations that are in any way intended to, or materially result in, a reduction in premium charges to the qualified association due to the health status of the membership of the qualified association. In addition to any other remedies available to the commissioner to enforce this chapter, the commissioner may declare a contract between a carrier and a qualified association for administrative services pursuant to this section null and void if the commissioner determines any discounts provided to the qualified association are intended to, or materially result in, a reduction in premium charges to the qualified association due to the health status of the membership of the qualified association.

(b) For the purposes of this section, a qualified association is a nonprofit corporation comprised of a group of individuals or employers who associate based solely on participation in a specified profession or industry, that conforms to all of the following requirements:

(1) It accepts for membership any individual or small employer meeting its membership criteria.

(2) It does not condition membership, directly or indirectly, on the health or claims history of any person.

(3) It uses membership dues solely for and in consideration of the membership and membership benefits, except that the amount of the dues shall not depend on whether the member applies for or purchases insurance offered by the association.

(4) It is organized and maintained in good faith for purposes unrelated to insurance.

(5) It existed on January 1, 1972, and has been in continuous existence since that date.

(6) It has a constitution and bylaws or other analogous governing documents that provide for election of the governing board of the association by its members.

(7) It offered, marketed, or sold health coverage to its members for 20 continuous years prior to January 1, 1993.

(8) It agrees to offer any plan contract only to association members.

(9) It agrees to include any member choosing to enroll in the plan contract offered by the association, provided that
 the member agrees to make required premium payments.

(10) It complies with all provisions of this article.

(11) It had at least 10,000 enrollees covered by association-sponsored plans immediately prior to enactment of Chapter 1128 of the Statutes of 1992.

(12) It applies any administrative cost at an equal rate to all members purchasing coverage through the qualified association.

(c) A qualified association shall comply with the requirements set forth in Section 10198.9.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 15.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10755.18.7.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no provision of this chapter shall be construed to limit the applicability of any other provision of the Insurance Code unless such provision is in conflict with the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 15.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8.5. Coverage for Federally Eligible Defined Individuals [10785. - 10786.]

10785.

(a) A disability insurer that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses under an individual health benefit plan as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 10198.6 may not, with respect to a federally eligible defined individual desiring to enroll in individual health insurance coverage, decline to offer coverage to, or deny enrollment of, the individual or impose any preexisting condition exclusion with respect to the coverage.

(b) For purposes of this section, “federally eligible defined individual” means an individual who, as of the date on which the individual seeks coverage under this section, meets all of the following conditions:

(1) Has had 18 or
 more months of creditable coverage, and whose most recent prior creditable coverage was under a group health plan, a federal governmental plan maintained for federal employees, or a governmental plan or church plan as defined in the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 1002).

(2) Is not eligible for coverage under a group health plan, Medicare, or Medi-Cal, and does not have other health insurance coverage.

(3) Was not terminated from his or her most recent creditable coverage due to nonpayment of premiums or fraud.

(4) If offered continuation coverage under COBRA or Cal-COBRA, has elected and exhausted that coverage.

(c) Every disability insurer that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses shall comply with
 applicable federal statutes and regulations regarding the provision of coverage to federally eligible defined individuals, including any relevant application periods.

(d) A disability insurer shall offer the following health benefit plans under this section that are designed for, made generally available to, are actively marketed to, and enroll, individuals: (1) either the two most popular products as defined in Section 300gg-41(c)(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code and Section 148.120(c)(2) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations or (2) the two most representative products as defined in Section 300gg-41(c)(3) of the United States Code and Section 148.120(c)(3) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as determined by the insurer in compliance with federal law. An insurer that offers only one health benefit plan to individuals, excluding health benefit plans offered to Medi-Cal or Medicare
 beneficiaries, shall be deemed to be in compliance with this chapter if it offers that health benefit plan contract to federally eligible defined individuals in a manner consistent with this chapter.

(e) (1) In the case of a disability insurer that offers health benefit plans in the individual market through a network plan, the insurer may do both of the following:

(A) Limit the individuals who may be enrolled under that coverage to those who live, reside, or work within the service area for the network plan.

(B) Within the service area covered by the health benefit plan, deny coverage to individuals if the insurer has demonstrated to the commissioner that the insured will not have the capacity to deliver services adequately to additional individual insureds because of its obligations to
 existing group policyholders, group contractholders and insureds, and individual insureds, and that the insurer is applying this paragraph uniformly to individuals without regard to any health status-related factor of the individuals and without regard to whether the individuals are federally eligible defined individuals.

(2) A disability insurer, upon denying health insurance coverage in any service area in accordance with subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), may not offer health benefit plans through a network in the individual market within that service area for a period of 180 days after the coverage is denied.

(f) (1) A disability insurer may deny health insurance coverage in the individual market to a federally eligible defined individual if the insurer has demonstrated to the commissioner both of the following:

(A) The insurer does not have the financial reserves necessary to underwrite additional coverage.

(B) The insurer is applying this subdivision uniformly to all individuals in the individual market and without regard to any health status-related factor of the individuals and without regard to whether the individuals are federally eligible defined individuals.

(2) A disability insurer, upon denying individual health insurance coverage in any service area in accordance with paragraph (1), may not offer that coverage in the individual market within that service area for a period of 180 days after the date the coverage is denied or until the insurer has demonstrated to the commissioner that the insurer has sufficient financial reserves to underwrite additional coverage, whichever is later.

(g) The requirement pursuant to federal law to furnish a certificate of creditable coverage shall apply to health benefits plans offered by a disability insurer in the individual market in the same manner as it applies to an insurer in connection with a group health benefit plan policy or group health benefit plan contract.

(h) A disability insurer shall compensate an accident and health agent or a life and accident and health agent whose activities result in the enrollment of federally eligible defined individuals in the same manner and consistent with the renewal commission amounts as the insurer compensates accident and health agents or life and accident and health agents for other enrollees who are not federally eligible defined individuals and who are purchasing the same individual health benefit plan.

(i) Every
 disability insurer shall disclose as part of its COBRA or Cal-COBRA disclosure and enrollment documents, an explanation of the availability of guaranteed access to coverage under the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, including the necessity to enroll in and exhaust COBRA or Cal-COBRA benefits in order to become a federally eligible defined individual.

(j) No disability insurer may request documentation as to whether or not a person is a federally eligible defined individual other than is permitted under applicable federal law or regulations.

(k) This section shall not apply to coverage defined as excepted benefits pursuant to Section 300gg(c) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(l) This section shall apply to policies or contracts offered, delivered, amended, or renewed on
 or after January 1, 2001.

(m) (1) On and after January 1, 2014, and except as provided in paragraph (2), this section shall apply only to individual grandfathered health plans previously issued pursuant to this section to federally eligible defined individuals.

(2) If Section 5000A of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Section 1501 of PPACA, is repealed or amended to no longer apply to the individual market, as defined in Section 2791 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-91), paragraph (1) shall become inoperative on the date of that repeal or amendment and this section shall apply to health benefit plans issued, amended, or renewed on or after that date.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, the
 following definitions apply:

(A) “Grandfathered health plan” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 1251 of PPACA.

(B) “PPACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and any rules, regulations, or guidance issued pursuant to that law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 441, Sec. 17.5.   (AB 1180)   Effective October 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, pursuant to Sec. 26 of Ch 441.)
-------------------------------------------

10786.
